Connecticut, session 2026, HB05464.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 4a-67d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(d) [(1)] On and after January 1, 2030, at least thirty per cent of all
buses purchased or leased by the state shall be zero-emission buses.
[(2) On and after January 1, 2024, the state shall cease to procure,
purchase or lease any diesel-fueled transit bus.]
Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 4b-13a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(c) No person shall park a vehicle in a parking space equipped with
a state agency electric vehicle charging station unless such person is
charging a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle or battery electric vehicle,
except such person may park a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle or battery
electric vehicle in such a parking space without charging such vehicle at
the discretion of the state agency that designated the state agency
electric vehicle charging station as available for public use.
Sec. 3. Section 4b-77 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section, (1) "electric vehicle charging station" has
the same meaning as provided in section 16-19f, (2) "level two electric
vehicle charging station" means an electric vehicle charging station that
supplies two hundred eight to two hundred forty volt alternating
current, [and] (3) "direct current fast charging station" means an electric
vehicle charging station that utilizes direct current electricity providing
forty kilowatts or greater, and (4) "electric vehicle capable parking
space" means a parking space that has equipment installed during
construction to support future implementation of charging, including,
but not limited to, the raceways and electrical panel space necessary for
the installation of an electric vehicle charging station.
(b) On and after [January 1, 2023] July 1, 2026, the Commissioner of
Administrative Services shall require each new [construction of a] state
facility [, the total project costs of which exceed] that will include public
parking spaces and is projected to cost more than one hundred thousand
dollars [,] to be [installed with level two electric vehicle charging
stations in] constructed such that at least [twenty] eight per cent of the
designated parking spaces for cars [or light duty trucks] at such new
state facility are electric vehicle capable parking spaces.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2029, and every three years thereafter,
the Commissioners of Administrative Services, Transportation and
Public Act No. 26-63 2 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
Energy and Environmental Protection shall jointly submit
recommendations, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a,
regarding the electric vehicle capable parking space requirements
established in subsection (b) of this section to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to government administration, transportation and the
environment. Such recommendations shall propose an appropriate
requirement for future electric vehicle charging infrastructure at new
state facilities. In proposing such appropriate requirement, the
commissioners shall consider: (1) The current public prevalence of
electric vehicles and the market conditions for purchasing such vehicles;
(2) the expected future growth in electric vehicle ownership by state
employees and the public; (3) the current and future utilization of
electric vehicle charging spaces at state facilities; (4) similar
requirements for new construction in neighboring states and in
nationally recognized model building codes; and (5) the state goals for
the reduction of pollution from the transportation sector, including, but
not limited to, the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions.
[(c)] (d) On and after January 1, 2023, a municipality shall require
each new construction of a commercial building or multiunit residential
building with thirty or more designated parking spaces for cars or light
duty trucks to include electric vehicle charging infrastructure that is
capable of supporting level two electric vehicle charging stations or
direct current fast charging stations in at least ten per cent of such
parking spaces. A municipality may, through its legislative body,
require any such commercial building or multiunit residential building
to include such electric vehicle charging infrastructure in more than ten
per cent of such parking spaces.
Sec. 4. Section 2 of public act 25-90 is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, unless
Public Act No. 26-63 3 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
otherwise required by federal law, the provisions of this section shall
govern the issuance of any state approval for district improvements
concerning the Port Eastside Infrastructure Improvement District
established pursuant to section 1 of [this act] public act 25-90. If the
district enters into a written agreement with any public entity for work
to be performed in connection with the district improvements,
including, but not limited to, obtaining a permit, license or
governmental approval, acquiring real property or construction of
sewer, water, steam or other utility connections, any administrative
action taken by such public entity in connection with such work shall be
governed by the provisions of this section unless otherwise required by
federal law or any other agreement to which such public entity is bound.
(b) Any approval for district improvements shall be issued by the
commissioner with jurisdiction over such approval, or such other state
official as such commissioner shall designate, and no other agency,
commission, council, committee, panel or other body other than such
commissioner, unless specifically designated by such commissioner,
shall have jurisdiction over any such approval. No notice of a tentative
or final determination regarding any such approval and no notice of any
such approval shall be required except as provided in this section.
(c) Any application for an approval for district improvements
required by any applicable provision of the general statutes shall be
submitted to the commissioner having jurisdiction as provided in this
subsection. The commissioner shall, to the extent practicable in the
discretion of the commissioner, adopt a master process to consider
multiple licenses, permits, approvals and administrative actions
pursuant to this section. Unless denied by the commissioner, any license
or permit shall be issued, approval shall be granted as requested and
administrative action shall be taken not later than ten business days
after the date of submission of any such application unless a hearing is
required to be held concerning such application. Such application shall
Public Act No. 26-63 4 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
be deemed granted as requested on the eleventh business day after a
hearing is held on such application unless the commissioner has denied
such application or approved such application with conditions. Any
requirement for a permit or inspection by the State Building Inspector
or State Fire Marshal shall be satisfied if the district obtains a
certification from an engineer or other appropriate professional duly
certified or licensed in the state certifying that the work in connection
with the district improvements, to the extent such work is subject to
approval by the State Building Inspector or State Fire Marshal, is in
compliance with the State Building Code or fire code and safety
regulations, as applicable.
(d) Any hearing regarding all or part of the district improvements
shall be conducted by the commissioner. Notice of any such hearing
shall be published in a newspaper having a general circulation in the
town of East Hartford not more than ten and not less than five days
before such hearing.
(e) Any application, documentation or other records (1) submitted to
a commissioner, and (2) pertaining to an application for an approval for
district improvements, together with all records of the proceedings of
the commissioner relating to any such application, shall be a public
record and shall be made, maintained and disclosed in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 14 of the general statutes.
(f) In rendering a decision on any application for an approval for
district improvements, a commissioner shall weigh all competent
material and substantial evidence presented by the applicant and the
public. The commissioner shall issue written findings and
determinations upon which any such decision is based. Such findings
and determinations shall consist of evidence presented, including such
information as the commissioner deems appropriate, provided such
information, to the extent applicable, relates to any major adverse health
or environmental impact of the overall district improvements. The
Public Act No. 26-63 5 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
commissioner may reverse or modify any order or action at any time
upon the commissioner's own motion. The procedure for such reversal
or modification shall be the same as the procedure for the original
proceeding.
(g) Any administrative action taken by any commissioner in
connection with the district improvements may be appealed by a party
aggrieved by such action to the superior court for the judicial district of
Hartford in accordance with the provisions of section 4-183 of the
general statutes. Such appeal shall be brought not more than ten days
after the date the commissioner mails to the parties to the proceeding a
notice of such order, decision or action by certified mail, return receipt
requested. The appellant shall serve a copy of the appeal on each party
listed in the final order, decision or action at the address shown in such
decision. Failure to make such service within the ten days on parties
other than the commissioner who rendered the final order, decision or
action may not, in the discretion of the court, deprive the court of
jurisdiction over the appeal. Not later than ten days following the
service of such appeal, or within such further time as may be allowed
by the court, the commissioner who rendered such decision shall cause
any portion of the record that had not been transcribed to be transcribed
and shall cause the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the
proceeding appealed from to be transmitted to the reviewing court. The
record shall include the commissioner's findings of fact and conclusions
of law, separately stated. If more than one commissioner has jurisdiction
over the matter, such commissioners shall issue joint findings of fact and
conclusions of law. The appeal shall state the reasons upon which such
appeal is predicated and, notwithstanding any provisions of the general
statutes, shall not stay the development of the improvements. The
commissioner who rendered the decision shall appear as the
respondent. Appeals to the superior court shall be privileged matters
and shall be heard as soon after the return date as practicable. The court
shall render its decision not later than twenty-one days after the date
Public Act No. 26-63 6 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
that the entire record with the transcript is filed with the court by the
commissioner who rendered the decision.
(h) (1) In an appeal pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, the court
shall not substitute its judgment for that of the commissioner as to the
weight of the evidence presented on a question of fact. The court shall
affirm the decision of the commissioner unless the court finds that
substantial rights of the party appealing the decision have been
materially prejudiced because the administrative findings, inferences,
conclusions or decisions of the commissioner are: (A) In violation of
constitutional or statutory provisions, (B) in excess of the statutory
authority of the commissioner, (C) made upon unlawful procedure, (D)
affected by an error of law, (E) clearly erroneous in view of the reliable,
probative and substantial evidence on the whole record, or (F) arbitrary,
capricious or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly
unwarranted exercise of discretion.
(2) If the court finds material prejudice, it may sustain the appeal, and
upon sustaining an appeal may render a judgment that modifies the
decision of the commissioner, orders particular action of the
commissioner or orders the commissioner to take such action as may be
necessary to effect a particular action. The commissioner may issue a
permit consistent with such judgment. An applicant may file an
amended application, and the commissioner may consider such
amended application for an approval for district improvements
following such court action.
[(i) Except as provided in this section, the district improvements shall
be exempt from the provisions of sections 14-311 to 14-314d, inclusive,
of the general statutes.]
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section and
sections 6 to 10, inclusive, of this act:
Public Act No. 26-63 7 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(1) "Department" means the Department of Transportation;
(2) "Personally identifiable information" means information created
or maintained by the department, a municipality or a vendor that
identifies or describes an owner and includes, but need not be limited
to, the owner's address, telephone number, number plate, photograph,
bank account information, credit card number, debit card number or the
date, time, location or direction of travel on a highway;
(3) "Vendor" means a person selected by the department (A) to
provide services to the department described in sections 6 to 10,
inclusive, of this act; (B) who operates, maintains, leases or licenses a
dynamic part-time lane control system; or (C) who is authorized to
review and assemble the recorded images captured by the dynamic
part-time lane control system;
(4) "Dynamic part-time lane control system" means a device having
one or more motor vehicle sensors connected to a camera system
capable of producing recorded images that indicate the date, time and
location of the image of each motor vehicle allegedly operating in
violation of section 6 of this act or an ordinance adopted under section
10 of this act;
(5) "Dynamic part-time lane control system operator" means a person
who is trained and certified to operate a dynamic part-time lane control
system;
(6) "Dynamic part-time lane" means any lane or shoulder of a
highway temporarily designated for a specific use by the Office of the
State Traffic Administration to control and manage traffic;
(7) "Authorized emergency vehicle", "driver", "highway", "number
plate" and "owner" have the same meanings as provided in section 14-1
of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
Public Act No. 26-63 8 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(8) "Official traffic control devices" has the same meaning as provided
in section 14-297 of the general statutes; and
(9) "High occupancy vehicle lane" has the same meaning as provided
in section 14-238b of the general statutes.
(b) The Office of the State Traffic Administration may designate any
lane or shoulder of a highway as a dynamic part-time lane to be used (1)
as a high occupancy vehicle lane, (2) as a dedicated lane for bus rapid
transit or other motor or service bus usage, (3) as a dedicated lane for
authorized emergency vehicles responding to an emergency call, (4) to
redirect an opposing lane of a highway into a one-way lane, or (5) as is
necessary to maintain the function of the state's highway system. The
office may adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the provisions of this
subsection.
(c) The Department of Transportation may establish a program to
operate dynamic part-time lane control systems within a dynamic part-
time lane designated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. A
dynamic part-time lane control system shall be used in a manner to only
record images of motor vehicles that are allegedly operating in violation
of the provisions of section 6 of this act or an ordinance adopted under
section 10 of this act. Any recorded images collected as part of a dynamic
part-time lane control system shall not be used for any surveillance
purposes.
(d) A dynamic part-time lane control system may be used provided
(1) such system is operated by a dynamic part-time lane control system
operator, (2) if, in accordance with the manual of uniform traffic control
devices as approved and revised by the Office of the State Traffic
Administration, at least two conspicuous road signs are placed at a
reasonable distance in advance of a dynamic part-time lane, (3) the first
road sign described in subdivision (2) of this subsection indicates the
Public Act No. 26-63 9 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
reason said office designated such lane as a dynamic part-time lane, (4)
the second road sign described in subdivision (2) of this subsection
indicates that the dynamic part-time lane control system is operational
or is not operational, (5) an appropriate sign is conspicuously placed at
the end of a highway dynamic part-time lane with a dynamic part-time
lane control system that is operational, and (6) a notice identifying the
location of a dynamic part-time lane control system is available on the
Internet web site of the department.
(e) The Department of Transportation may (1) enter into agreements
with vendors for the design, operation or maintenance, or any
combination thereof, of dynamic part-time lane control systems, and (2)
retain and employ consultants and assistants on a contract or other basis
for rendering legal, financial, professional, technical or other assistance
and advice necessary for the design, operation and maintenance of
dynamic part-time lane control systems. If a vendor provides, deploys
or operates a dynamic part-time lane control system, the vendor's fee
may not be contingent on the number of violations issued or fines paid
pursuant to the provisions of section 6 of this act or an ordinance
adopted under section 10 of this act.
(f) The Commissioner of Transportation may adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to
implement the provisions of this section and sections 6 to 10, inclusive,
of this act and establish standards and procedures for dynamic part-
time lanes and dynamic part-time lane control systems.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) (1) When a dynamic part-
time lane is used as a high occupancy vehicle lane pursuant to section 5
of this act, no person may operate a motor vehicle in such dynamic part-
time lane unless such person is (A) traveling with one or more
passengers in such person's motor vehicle, or (B) operating a blood
transport vehicle in accordance with the provisions of section 14-238b of
the general statutes.
Public Act No. 26-63 10 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(2) When a dynamic part-time lane is used as a dedicated lane for bus
rapid transit service or other motor or service bus usage pursuant to
section 5 of this act, no person (A) may operate a motor vehicle in such
dynamic part-time lane unless such person is operating such vehicle in
accordance with the provisions of subdivisions (1) to (4), inclusive, of
subsection (a) of section 14-296bb of the general statutes, or (B) may stop
or park in such dynamic part-time lane unless such person is obeying
the direction indicated by an official traffic control device or the
direction of a law enforcement officer.
(3) When a dynamic part-time lane is used as a dedicated lane for an
authorized emergency vehicle responding to an emergency pursuant to
section 5 of this act, no person may operate a motor vehicle in such
dynamic part-time lane unless such person is (A) operating an
authorized emergency vehicle responding to an emergency call, or (B)
obeying the direction of a law enforcement officer.
(4) When a dynamic part-time lane is used as a dedicated lane to
redirect an opposing lane of a highway into a one-way lane or to
maintain the function of the state's highway system pursuant to section
5 of this act, no person may operate a motor vehicle in such dynamic
part-time lane unless such person is obeying the direction indicated by
an official traffic control device or the direction of a law enforcement
officer.
(b) The owner of a motor vehicle identified by a dynamic part-time
lane control system as violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section shall, (1) for a first violation, be fined seventy-five dollars, and
(2) for a second or subsequent violation that occurs within one year of
the date of such owner's most recent violation, be fined not more than
two hundred dollars. Any subsequent violation occurring more than
one year after such owner's most recent violation shall be considered a
first violation.
Public Act No. 26-63 11 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(c) The owner shall be liable for any fine imposed pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section unless the driver of the motor vehicle
received a citation from a law enforcement officer at the time of the
violation. In the case of a motor vehicle that is leased for more than thirty
days and identified by a dynamic part-time lane control system as
violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the lessee shall
be considered the owner of such motor vehicle for the purposes of this
section and section 7 and subsection (b) of section 8 of this act.
(d) All amounts received from fines imposed pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section shall be deposited into the Special Transportation
Fund, established pursuant to section 13b-68 of the general statutes and
maintained pursuant to article thirty-second of the amendments to the
Constitution of the state. The provisions of this subsection shall not
apply to any amounts received from fines imposed pursuant to an
ordinance adopted under section 10 of this act.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) (1) Whenever a dynamic
part-time lane control system detects and produces recorded images of
a motor vehicle allegedly committing a violation of section 6 of this act,
a sworn member or authorized member of the Division of State Police
within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
shall review the recorded images provided by such system. Whenever
a dynamic part-time lane control system detects and produces recorded
images of a motor vehicle allegedly committing a violation of an
ordinance adopted by a municipality under section 10 of this act, a
sworn member or employee of the municipality's police department or
an employee of the municipality designated by the traffic authority of
such municipality shall review the recorded images provided by such
system.
(2) If, after the review conducted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, such member or employee determines that there are
reasonable grounds to believe that a violation has occurred, such
Public Act No. 26-63 12 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
member or employee may issue a notice of violation for the alleged
violation. Such notice of violation shall be sworn or affirmed by such
member or employee and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts
contained in the notice. Such notice of violation shall include written
verification that the dynamic part-time lane control system was
operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation and specify the
date of the most recent inspection that confirms the dynamic part-time
lane control system to be operating properly.
(3) A dynamic part-time lane control system operator shall complete
training offered by the manufacturer of such system, or the
manufacturer's representative, including training on any devices critical
to the operation of such system or the procedures for setting up, testing
and operating such system. Upon completion of the training, the
manufacturer or manufacturer's representative shall issue a signed
certificate to the dynamic part-time lane control system operator. Such
signed certificate shall be admitted as evidence in any court proceeding
for an alleged violation of section 6 of this act or in any hearing
conducted pursuant to section 7-152c of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, as applicable.
(4) A dynamic part-time lane control system operator shall complete
and sign a daily log for a dynamic part-time lane control system. Such
daily log shall (A) state the date, time and location of such system's set-
up, (B) state that the dynamic part-time lane control system operator
successfully performed, and the dynamic part-time lane control system
passed, the testing specified by the manufacturer of the dynamic part-
time lane control system, (C) be kept on file at the principal office of the
operator, and (D) be admitted in any court proceeding for an alleged
violation of section 6 of this act or in any hearing conducted pursuant to
section 7-152c of the general statutes, as amended by this act, as
applicable.
(b) A dynamic part-time lane control system shall undergo an annual
Public Act No. 26-63 13 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
calibration check performed at a calibration laboratory. The calibration
laboratory shall issue a signed certificate of calibration after the annual
calibration check. Such signed certificate of calibration shall be kept on
file and admitted as evidence in any court proceeding for an alleged
violation of section 6 of this act or in any hearing conducted pursuant to
section 7-152c of the general statutes, as amended by this act, as
applicable.
(c) The notice of violation for the alleged violation of section 6 of this
act or an ordinance adopted under section 10 of this act shall include,
but need not be limited to, (1) a copy of the recorded image showing the
vehicle with its number plate visible, (2) the registration number and
state of issuance of the vehicle registration, (3) verification that the
dynamic part-time lane control system was operating correctly at the
time of the alleged violation and the date of the most recent calibration
check, and (4) the date, time and location of the alleged violation.
(d) In the case of an alleged violation of section 6 of this act or an
ordinance adopted under section 10 of this act involving a motor vehicle
registered in the state, the notice of violation shall be mailed not later
than thirty days after the commission of the alleged violation or after the
identity of the owner is ascertained, whichever is later, to the address of
the owner that is in the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(e) In the case of an alleged violation of section 6 of this act or an
ordinance adopted under section 10 of this act involving a motor vehicle
registered in another jurisdiction, the notice of the violation shall be
mailed not later than thirty days after the identity of the owner is
ascertained to the address of the owner that is in the records of the
official in the other jurisdiction issuing such registration.
(f) A notice of violation shall be invalid unless mailed to an owner not
later than ninety days after the alleged violation of section 6 of this act
or an ordinance adopted under section 10 of this act.
Public Act No. 26-63 14 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(g) The notice of violation shall be sent by first class mail. A manual
or automatic record of mailing prepared by the dynamic part-time lane
control system operator in the ordinary course of business shall be
prima facie evidence of mailing and shall be admissible in any court
proceeding as to the facts contained in the notice.
(h) A violation of section 6 of this act or an ordinance adopted under
section 10 of this act shall not (1) be included in any driver control record
maintained pursuant to section 14-111l of the general statutes, (2) be
subject to merit rating for insurance purposes, or (3) authorize the
imposition of surcharge points in the provision of motor vehicle
insurance coverage.
(i) The following defenses shall be available to the owner of a motor
vehicle identified by a dynamic part-time lane control system as
allegedly violating section 6 of this act or an ordinance adopted under
section 10 of this act: (1) The violation took place during a period of time
in which the motor vehicle had been reported as being stolen to a law
enforcement unit, as defined in section 7-294a of the general statutes,
and had not been recovered prior to the time of the violation, and (2) the
dynamic part-time lane control system used to determine the violation
was not in compliance with the provisions of this section relating to tests
for accuracy, certification or calibration.
(j) An owner who receives a notice of violation of section 6 of this act
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall follow the procedures set
forth in section 51-164n of the general statutes, as amended by this act.
The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an owner who is
alleged to have violated an ordinance adopted under section 10 of this
act.
Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) The Department of Motor
Vehicles shall provide the Department of Transportation and any
vendor with information regarding the owner of a motor vehicle
Public Act No. 26-63 15 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
identified by a part-time lane control system as allegedly violating the
provisions of section 6 of this act or an ordinance adopted under section
10 of this act. Such information shall include, but need not be limited to,
the make and number plate of such motor vehicle and the name and
address of the owner of such motor vehicle.
(b) If an owner fails to (1) pay the fine imposed for a violation or
conviction of section 6 of this act, (2) submit a plea of not guilty by the
answer date, or (3) appear for any scheduled court appearance at the
time and place assigned, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may
refuse to register or suspend the registration of the motor vehicle
operated at the time of such violation.
Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) No personally identifiable
information shall be sold or disclosed by the department, a municipality
or a vendor to any person or entity except where the disclosure is made
in connection with the charging, collection and enforcement of the fines
imposed pursuant to section 6 of this act or an ordinance adopted under
section 10 of this act.
(b) No personally identifiable information shall be stored or retained
by the department, a municipality or a vendor unless such information
is necessary for the collection and enforcement of the fines imposed
pursuant to section 6 of this act or an ordinance adopted under section
10 of this act.
(c) The department, a municipality or a vendor shall destroy
personally identifiable information and other data that specifically
identifies a motor vehicle and relates to a violation of section 6 of this
act or an ordinance adopted under section 10 of this act not later than
thirty days after any fine is imposed or the resolution of a trial or hearing
conducted for the alleged commission of such violation, whichever is
later, except the department, a municipality or a vendor may retain a
portion of personally identifiable information for the limited purpose of
Public Act No. 26-63 16 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
determining whether a person committed a second or subsequent
violation of said section or such ordinance. The department,
municipality or vendor shall destroy any retained portion of personally
identifiable information not later than one year after the date of such
person's most recent violation.
(d) Personally identifiable information shall not be deemed a public
record, for purposes of the Freedom of Information Act, as defined in
section 1-200 of the general statutes.
Sec. 10. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) Any municipality
operating a bus in a dynamic part-time lane may participate in the
program to operate dynamic part-time control systems established
pursuant to section 6 of this act, provided such municipality (1) adopts
an ordinance in accordance with the provisions of this section, and (2)
enters into an agreement with the Department of Transportation
concerning the design, installation, operation and maintenance of such
dynamic part-time lane control systems.
(b) Any ordinance adopted under this section shall specify the
following: (1) That an owner of a motor vehicle commits a violation of
the ordinance if the person operating such motor vehicle does so in
violation of subsection (a) of section 6 of this act and such operation is
detected by a dynamic part-time lane control system operated by the
Department of Transportation on behalf of the municipality; (2) a fine,
if any, to be imposed against the owner of a motor vehicle committing a
violation of such ordinance, provided the amount of such fine is not
more than seventy-five dollars for a first violation and not more than
two hundred dollars for a second or subsequent violation that occurs
within one year of the date of such owner's most recent violation; (3) the
payment of any such fine may be made by electronic means; and (4) the
defenses available to the owner of a motor vehicle allegedly committing
a violation of such ordinance, which shall include, but need not be
limited to, the defenses listed in subsection (i) of section 7 of this act.
Public Act No. 26-63 17 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
Any subsequent violation occurring more than one year after such
owner's most recent violation shall be considered a first violation.
(c) Any municipality that adopts an ordinance under this section shall
also adopt a citation hearing procedure pursuant to section 7-152c of the
general statutes, as amended by this act, with regard to alleged
violations of such ordinance.
(d) Any funds received by the municipality from fines imposed
pursuant to an ordinance adopted under this section shall be deposited
into the general fund of the municipality or in any special fund
designated by the municipality.
(e) No person shall be subject to the fine in subsection (b) of section 6
of this act and a fine for the violation of an ordinance adopted under this
section because of the same offense.
Sec. 11. Subsection (c) of section 7-152c of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
1, 2027):
(c) Any such municipality, at any time within twelve months from
the expiration of the final period for the uncontested payment of fines,
penalties, costs or fees for any citation issued under any ordinance
adopted pursuant to section 7-148, 14-279c, 14-307c, 14-307j or 22a-226d
or section 10 of this act, for an alleged violation thereof, shall send notice
to the person cited. Such notice shall inform the person cited: (1) Of the
allegations against such person and the amount of the fines, penalties,
costs or fees due; (2) that such person may contest such person's liability
before a citation hearing officer by delivering in person or by mail
written notice within ten days of the date thereof; (3) that if such person
does not demand such a hearing, an assessment and judgment shall be
entered against such person; and (4) that such judgment may issue
without further notice. For purposes of this section, notice shall be
Public Act No. 26-63 18 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
presumed to have been properly sent if such notice was mailed to such
person's last-known address on file with the tax collector. If the person
to whom such notice is issued is a registrant, the municipality may
deliver such notice in accordance with section 7-148ii, provided nothing
in this section shall preclude a municipality from providing notice in
another manner permitted by applicable law.
Sec. 12. Section 3-6a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Whenever an emergency situation exists because of extreme
weather conditions or other acts of nature, other than as is provided in
section 28-9, requiring the restriction of movement of persons and
vehicles upon the streets and highways of the state, the Governor may
issue an order pursuant to section 3-1 designating the persons and
vehicles which shall be permitted to move and the routes which they
shall follow.
(b) [Violation of an order issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall be an infraction.] Any person who violates the provisions
of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than two hundred
fifty dollars.
Sec. 13. Subsection (b) of section 51-164n of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, any person
who is alleged to have committed (1) a violation under the provisions of
section 1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 2-71h, 3-6a, as amended by this act, 4b-13, 7-13, 7-
14, 7-35 or 7-41, subsection (c) of section 7-66, section 7-83, 7-147h, 7-148,
7-283, 7-325, 7-393, 8-12, 8-25, 8-27, 9-63, 9-322, 9-350, 10-185, 10-193, 10-
197, 10-198, 10-230, 10-251, 10-254, 10a-35, 12-52, 12-54, 12-129b or 12-
170aa, subdivision (3) of subsection (e) of section 12-286, section 12-286a,
Public Act No. 26-63 19 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
12-292, 12-314b or 12-326g, subdivision (4) of section 12-408, subdivision
(3), (5) or (6) of section 12-411, section 12-435c, 12-476a, 12-476b, 12-476c,
12-487, 13a-26b, 13a-71, 13a-107, 13a-113, 13a-114, 13a-115, 13a-117b,
13a-123, 13a-124, 13a-139, 13a-140, 13a-143b, 13a-253, 13a-263 or 13b-39f,
subsection (f) of section 13b-42, section 13b-90 or 13b-100, subsection (a)
of section 13b-108, section 13b-221 or 13b-292, subsection (a) or (b) of
section 13b-324, section 13b-336, 13b-337, 13b-338, 13b-410a, 13b-410b or
13b-410c, subsection (a), (b) or (c) of section 13b-412, section 13b-414 or
14-4, subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-12, subsection (d) of
section 14-12, subsection (f) of section 14-12a, subsection (a) of section
14-15a, section 14-16c, 14-20a or 14-27a, subsection (f) of section 14-34a,
subsection (d) of section 14-35, section 14-43, 14-44j, 14-49, 14-50a, 14-58
or 14-62a, subsection (b) of section 14-66, section 14-66a or 14-67a,
subsection (g) of section 14-80, as amended by this act, subsection (f) or
(i) of section 14-80h, section 14-97a or 14-98, subsection (a), (b) or (d) of
section 14-100a, section 14-100b, 14-103a, 14-106a, 14-106c, 14-145a, 14-
146, 14-152, 14-153, 14-161 or 14-163b, subsection (f) of section 14-164i,
section 14-213b or 14-219, subdivision (1) of section 14-223a, subsection
(d) of section 14-224, section 14-240 or 14-250, subdivision (2) of
subsection (e) of section 14-251, section 14-253a, 14-261a, 14-262, 14-264,
14-266, 14-267a, 14-269, 14-270, 14-272b, 14-274, 14-275 or 14-275a,
subsection (c) of section 14-275c, section 14-276, subsection (a) or (b) of
section 14-277, section 14-278, 14-279 or 14-280, subsection (b), (e) or (h)
of section 14-283, section 14-283d, 14-283e, 14-283f, 14-283g, 14-289l, 14-
291, 14-293b, 14-296aa, as amended by this act, 14-298a, 14-300, 14-300d,
14-300f, 14-319, 14-320, 14-321, 14-325a, 14-326, 14-330 or 14-332a,
subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of section 14-386a, section 15-15e, 15-25 or 15-
33, subdivision (1) of section 15-97, subsection (a) of section 15-115,
section 16-15, 16-16, 16-44, 16-256e, 16-278 or 16a-15, subsection (a) of
section 16a-21, section 16a-22, subsection (a) or (b) of section 16a-22h,
section 16a-106, 17a-24, 17a-145, 17a-149 or 17a-152, subsection (b) of
section 17a-227, section 17a-465, subsection (c) of section 17a-488, section
17b-124, 17b-131, 17b-137, 19a-33, 19a-39 or 19a-87, subsection (b) of
Public Act No. 26-63 20 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
section 19a-87a, section 19a-91, 19a-102a, 19a-102b, 19a-105, 19a-107,
19a-113, 19a-215, 19a-216a, 19a-219, 19a-222, 19a-224, 19a-286, 19a-287,
19a-297, 19a-301, 19a-309, 19a-335, 19a-336, 19a-338, 19a-339, 19a-340,
19a-425, 19a-442, 19a-502, 19a-565, 20-7a, 20-14, 20-153a, 20-158, 20-231,
20-233, 20-249, 20-257, 20-265, 20-324e, 20-329c or 20-329g, subsection (b)
of section 20-334, section 20-341l, 20-366, 20-482, 20-597, 20-608, 20-610,
20-623, 21-1, 21-38, 21-39, 21-43, 21-47, 21-48 or 21-63, subsection (d) of
section 21-71, section 21-76a or 21-100, subsection (c) of section 21a-2,
subdivision (1) of section 21a-19, section 21a-20 or 21a-21, subdivision
(1) of subsection (b) of section 21a-25, section 21a-26, subsection (a) of
section 21a-37, section 21a-46, 21a-61, 21a-63, 21a-70b or 21a-77,
subsection (b) or (c) of section 21a-79, section 21a-85 or 21a-154,
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-159, section 21a-278b,
subsection (c), (d) or (e) of section 21a-279a, section 21a-415a, 21a-
421eee, 21a-421fff or 21a-421hhh, subsection (a) of section 21a-430,
section 22-12b, 22-13, 22-14, 22-15, 22-16, 22-26g, 22-30, 22-34, 22-35, 22-
36, 22-38, 22-39, 22-39f, 22-49, 22-54, 22-61j or 22-61l, subdivision (1) of
subsection (n) of section 22-61l, subsection (f) of section 22-61m,
subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of section 22-61m, section 22-84, 22-89,
22-90, 22-96, 22-98, 22-99, 22-100 or 22-111o, subsection (d) of section 22-
118l, section 22-167, subsection (c) of section 22-277, section 22-278, 22-
279, 22-280a, 22-318a, 22-320h, 22-324a or 22-326, subsection (b),
subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (e) or subsection (g) of section 22-344,
subsection (a) or (b) of section 22-344b, subsection (d) of section 22-344d,
section 22-344f, 22-350a, 22-354, 22-359, 22-366, 22-391, 22-413, 22-414,
22-415, 22-415c, 22a-66a or 22a-246, subsection (a) of section 22a-250,
section 22a-256g, subsection (e) of section 22a-256h, section 22a-363 or
22a-381d, subsections (c) and (d) of section 22a-381e, section 22a-449,
22a-450, 22a-461, 23-4b, 23-38, 23-45, 23-46 or 23-61b, subsection (a) or
subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 23-65, section 25-37 or 25-40,
subsection (a) of section 25-43, section 25-43d, 25-135, 26-18, 26-19, 26-
21, 26-31, 26-40, 26-40a, 26-42, 26-43, 26-49, 26-54, 26-55, 26-56, 26-58 or
26-59, subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of section 26-61, section 26-64,
Public Act No. 26-63 21 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
subdivision (1) of section 26-76, section 26-79, 26-87, 26-89, 26-91, 26-94,
26-97, 26-98, 26-104, 26-105, 26-107, 26-114a, 26-117, subsection (b) of
section 26-127, 26-128, 26-128a, 26-131, 26-132, 26-138, 26-139 or 26-141,
subdivision (1) of section 26-186, section 26-207, 26-215, 26-217 or 26-
224a, subdivision (1) of section 26-226, section 26-227, 26-230, 26-231, 26-
232, 26-244, 26-257a, 26-260, 26-276, 26-280, 26-284, 26-285, 26-286, 26-
287, 26-288, 26-290, 26-291a, 26-292, 26-294, 27-107, 28-13, 29-6a, 29-16,
29-17, 29-25, 29-143o, 29-143z or 29-156a, subsection (b), (d), (e), (g) or
(h) of section 29-161q, section 29-161y or 29-161z, subdivision (1) of
section 29-198, section 29-210, 29-243 or 29-277, subsection (c) of section
29-291c, section 29-316 or 29-318, subsection (b) of section 29-335a,
section 29-381, 30-19f, 30-48a or 30-86a, subsection (b) of section 30-89,
subsection (c) or (d) of section 30-117, section 31-3, 31-10, 31-11, 31-12,
31-13, 31-14, 31-15, 31-16, 31-18, 31-23, 31-24, 31-25, 31-32, 31-36, 31-47 or
31-48, subsection (b) of section 31-48b, section 31-51, 31-51g, 31-52, 31-
52a, 31-53 or 31-54, subsection (a) or (c) of section 31-69, section 31-70,
31-74, 31-75, 31-76, 31-76a, 31-89b or 31-134, subsection (i) of section 31-
273, section 31-288, 31-348, 33-624, 33-1017, 34-13d or 34-412,
subdivision (1) of section 35-20, subsection (a) of section 36a-57,
subsection (b) of section 36a-665, section 36a-699, 36a-739, 36a-787, 38a-
2 or 38a-140, subsection (a) or (b) of section 38a-278, section 38a-479qq,
38a-479rr, 38a-506, 38a-548, 38a-626, 38a-680, 38a-713, 38a-733, 38a-764,
38a-786, 38a-828, 38a-829, 38a-885, 42-133hh, 42-470 or 42-480,
subsection (a) or (c) of section 43-16q, section 45a-283, 45a-450, 45a-634
or 45a-658, subdivision (13) or (14) of section 46a-54, section 46a-59, 46a-
81b, 46b-22, 46b-24, 46b-34, 46b-38d, 47-34a, 47-47 or 47-53, subsection
(i) of section 47a-21, subdivision (1) of subsection (k) of section 47a-21,
section 49-2a, 49-8a, 49-16, 52-143 or 52-289, subsection (j) of section 52-
362, section 53-133, 53-199, 53-212a, 53-249a, 53-252, 53-264, 53-280, 53-
290a, 53-302a, 53-303e, 53-311a, 53-314, 53-321, 53-322, 53-323 or 53-331,
subsection (b) of section 53-343a, section 53-344, subsection (b) or (c) of
section 53-344b, subsection (b) of section 53-345a, section 53-377, 53-422
or 53-450, [or] subsection (i) of section 54-36a or section 6 of this act, or
Public Act No. 26-63 22 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(2) a violation under the provisions of chapter 268, or (3) a violation of
any regulation adopted in accordance with the provisions of section 12-
484, 12-487 or 13b-410, or (4) a violation of any ordinance, regulation or
bylaw of any town, city or borough, except violations of building codes,
the health code or an ordinance described in subdivision (5) of this
subsection, for which the penalty exceeds ninety dollars but does not
exceed two hundred fifty dollars, unless such town, city or borough has
established a payment and hearing procedure for such violation
pursuant to section 7-152c, as amended by this act, or (5) a violation of
any ordinance adopted by a town, city or borough pursuant to section
14-224a, 14-390 or 14-390m for which the penalty does not exceed two
thousand dollars, unless such town, city or borough has established a
payment and hearing procedure for such violation pursuant to section
7-152c, as amended by this act, shall follow the procedures set forth in
this section.
Sec. 14. (Effective from passage) A portion of Connecticut Route 163
between the intersection of Connecticut Route 32 traveling in a
northwesterly direction to the intersection of Connecticut Route 82 in
the town of Montville shall be designated as the "Kevin Ryan Memorial
Highway".
Sec. 15. Section 13b-31h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Transportation shall develop, and thereafter
revise as necessary, guidelines governing tree and vegetation
management, removal and replacement along state highways for use by
its employees and contractors when undertaking maintenance and
construction projects. The goal of the guidelines shall be to ensure the
impacts of maintenance and construction projects on the environment,
landscape and noise pollution are balanced or outweighed by measures
taken to avoid and minimize the impacts.
Public Act No. 26-63 23 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(b) Such guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to,
provisions addressing (1) the safety of the traveling public; (2) general
roadside vegetation management activities performed by the
department, including, but not limited to, mowing, herbicide
application, grassing, replanting with native species whenever
practicable, limb management, tree removal and debris removal; (3)
beautification, enhancements and the effect on scenic roads designated
pursuant to section 13b-31c; (4) visibility enhancement; and (5) the
environmental impact of such work, including (A) preventing invasive
tree, brush or plant species' growth and impact, (B) storm water run-off,
(C) erosion, (D) replanting of vegetation species to expand and improve
pollinator habitats, as described in section 22-90b, and (E) reduced
mowing. Such guidelines shall apply to construction projects financed,
in whole or in part, with federal funds to the extent such guidelines do
not conflict with federal laws and regulations.
(c) Such guidelines shall not apply to the removal of any trees or
vegetation necessary to maintain public safety or that is performed
because of a weather-related civil preparedness emergency declared
pursuant to section 28-9.
(d) [On or before January 1, 2024] Not later than February 1, 2027, the
Commissioner of Transportation shall consider the results of the study
and recommendations conducted pursuant to section 63 of public act
24-151, as amended by this act, by the Department of Natural Resources
and the Environment at The University of Connecticut concerning the
carbon sequestration by trees and other vegetation along highways and
other areas in the state, and determine the need, if any, for revisions to
the guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. If the
commissioner determines a revision to such guidelines is not warranted,
the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
Public Act No. 26-63 24 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
transportation and the environment explaining the reasons for such
determination. If the commissioner revises such guidelines in response
to the results of such study, the commissioner shall submit such revised
guidelines to [the] such joint standing committees, [of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to transportation and
the environment,] in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
[The] Such joint standing committees [shall] may hold a joint public
hearing on such revised guidelines and the commissioner shall present
such revised guidelines at the public hearing, if any.
Sec. 16. Section 63 of public act 24-151 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Transportation shall provide a grant from
available resources to the Department of Natural Resources and the
Environment at The University of Connecticut for the purpose of
studying the carbon sequestration by trees and other vegetation along
highways and other areas in the state.
(b) The Department of Natural Resources and the Environment at
The University of Connecticut shall (1) submit an interim report, not
later than January 1, 2025, and a final report, not later than [July 1, 2025]
October 1, 2026, concerning the [department's findings] results of such
study and any recommendations to the Department of Transportation
and the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to transportation and the environment,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
and (2) present either or both such reports at [a] any hearing held jointly
by said joint standing committees.
Sec. 17. Section 13b-116 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subdivisions (8) to (11), inclusive, as follows (Effective January 1, 2027):
(NEW) (8) "Telemetric monitoring" means the continuous, automated
Public Act No. 26-63 25 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
collection and evaluation of operational and system performance data
that is generated by a digital network during a prearranged ride.
(NEW) (9) "Safety anomaly" means an unexpected or irregular event
detected through a digital network that deviates from performance
baselines established by a transportation network company that may
indicate a potential risk to the safety of a rider or driver, including, but
not limited to, high-force decelerations or structural vibrations
consistent with a motor vehicle accident, significant departures from the
path of the prearranged ride or prolonged periods of inactivity on the
digital network.
(NEW) (10) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as provided in
section 10a-55m.
(NEW) (11) "Service animal" has the same meaning as provided in
section 22-345.
Sec. 18. Subsection (a) of section 13b-118 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
(a) (1) A transportation network company shall provide for real-time
messaging between the company and the transportation network
company driver through the company's digital network when the driver
is using the digital network. Such messaging shall be available in both
English and Spanish.
(2) After a potential transportation network company rider submits a
request for a prearranged ride, the transportation network company
shall display to the rider through its digital network: [a] (A) A picture
of the transportation network company driver and the license plate
number of the transportation network company vehicle that will be
used to provide the prearranged ride before the rider enters such
vehicle, and (B) a notification identifying any safety features available
Public Act No. 26-63 26 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
through the digital network that may be used during a prearranged
ride. Each transportation network company shall, at a minimum,
provide the following safety features: (i) A location sharing feature that
allows a rider to share information about a prearranged ride with a third
party, (ii) an emergency assistance interface or other means to contact a
public safety answering point, as defined in section 28-25, during a
prearranged ride, (iii) an optional audio recording feature that may be
utilized during a prearranged ride, provided such feature includes
notice to the driver and is implemented in compliance with applicable
state and federal laws governing the recording of communications, and
(iv) the availability of support and resources twenty-four hours a day to
manage any incidents, accidents or emergencies that occur during a
prearranged ride.
(3) On each offer for a prearranged ride presented to a transportation
network company driver, the transportation network company shall
demarcate on any such offer whether the potential transportation
network company rider requesting such prearranged ride, or the third
party requesting a prearranged ride on behalf of a potential rider, has
been verified by the company. The company shall designate an
individual as verified if the company has authenticated the individual's
identity through the submission of a valid photograph, the comparison
of the individual's account information with records maintained by
another party or any other method that reasonably enables the company
to confirm the identity of the individual. A driver's decision to decline
an offer for a prearranged ride where the potential rider or requesting
third party is not designated as verified shall not, by itself, constitute
grounds for suspension, deactivation or other disciplinary action
against the driver by the company.
[(3)] (4) A transportation network company driver shall display on a
transportation network company vehicle a removable decal at all times
when the driver is connected to a digital network or is engaged in the
Public Act No. 26-63 27 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
provision of a prearranged ride. Such decal shall be: (A) Issued by the
transportation network company; (B) sufficiently large so as to be
readable during daylight hours at a distance of at least fifty feet; (C)
reflective, illuminated or otherwise visible in darkness; and (D)
displayed on the passenger side of the transportation network company
vehicle if such decal is illuminated.
(5) A transportation network company shall, through its digital
network, (A) implement and maintain a telemetric monitoring system
capable of providing an emergency assistance interface with the
opportunity to contact a public safety answering point, and (B) permit a
third party pursuant to an agreement with such company to receive,
review and respond in real time to verified safety requests generated by
the digital network relating to a safety anomaly occurring during a
prearranged ride.
Sec. 19. Subsection (c) of section 13b-118 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) (1) A transportation network company shall adopt, maintain and
enforce a policy of nondiscrimination on the basis of the age, color,
creed, destination, intellectual or physical disability, national origin,
race, sex, sexual orientation or gender identity with respect to
transportation network company riders, potential transportation
network company riders and transportation network company drivers.
A transportation network company shall notify all drivers who use the
company's digital network of such policy.
(2) No transportation network company may take or threaten to take
any retaliatory action, including suspending or banning access to its
digital network, against a transportation network company driver
solely because such driver filed a complaint with such company.
Public Act No. 26-63 28 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(3) A transportation network company shall adopt, maintain and
enforce a service animal nondiscrimination policy. Such policy, at a
minimum, shall: (A) Prohibit any transportation network company
driver using the company's digital network from canceling or refusing
to provide a prearranged ride to a potential rider on the basis that the
rider is accompanied by a service animal, regardless of any allergy, fear
or religious or cultural objection to such service animal, (B) require the
company to display, through its digital network, an option to a potential
rider to (i) disclose before a prearranged ride that such potential rider is
accompanied by a service animal, and (ii) report any instance in which
a driver cancels or refuses to provide a prearranged ride to such
potential rider in violation of applicable laws relating to the
accommodation of service animals and the company's service animal
nondiscrimination policy, (C) require the company, through its digital
network, to notify any driver who attempts to cancel or refuse to
provide a prearranged ride to a potential rider who has disclosed that
such potential rider is accompanied by a service animal that any such
cancellation or refusal may (i) violate applicable laws relating to the
accommodation of service animals and the company's service animal
nondiscrimination policy, and (ii) result in a permanent ban from
accessing the company's digital network, (D) require the company to
investigate and respond to each reported instance of a driver canceling
or refusing a prearranged ride on the basis that the rider is accompanied
by a service animal and to maintain records of such reports and the
company's investigation and response for a period of not less than three
years from the date of the reported cancellation or refusal, (E) require
the company to permanently ban a driver from accessing the company's
digital network if a driver violates the company's service animal
nondiscrimination policy, and (F) require the company, through its
digital network, to provide periodic reminders to drivers with an active
account on such digital network of the rights of riders with disabilities
and the applicability of laws relating to the accommodation of service
animals.
Public Act No. 26-63 29 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
Sec. 20. Section 13b-119 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
January 1, 2027):
(a) Prior to permitting an individual to act as a transportation
network company driver on its digital network, the transportation
network company shall:
(1) Require the individual to submit an application to the company
that includes information regarding the individual's name, address,
date of birth, motor vehicle operator's license number and motor vehicle
registration;
(2) (A) Conduct, or have a consumer reporting agency regulated
under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act conduct, a driving record
check and a local, state and national criminal history records check,
including a search of state and national sexual offender registry
databases provided such databases are accessible to the public, or (B)
arrange for the fingerprinting of the individual to be submitted to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records
check and to the State Police Bureau of Identification for a state criminal
history records check conducted in accordance with section 29-17a;
(3) Disclose to such individual, electronically or in writing, (A) the
insurance coverage, including the types of coverage and any coverage
limits, that the company provides while a transportation network
company driver is connected to the company's digital network or is
engaged in the provision of a prearranged ride, and (B) that a
transportation network company driver's personal automobile
insurance policy might not provide coverage while such driver is
connected to the company's digital network, available to receive a
request for a prearranged ride or engaged in the provision of a
prearranged ride; and
Public Act No. 26-63 30 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(4) Inform such individual, electronically or in writing, (A) that such
individual may enroll in the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Program pursuant to section 31-49m and obtain information about such
program from the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Authority
established in section 31-49f, (B) of the requirements to become qualified
to provide prearranged rides that originate in a neighboring state, and
(C) of the transportation network company's deactivation process for
transportation network company drivers. For the purposes of this
subdivision, "deactivation process" means procedures a transportation
network company undertakes to materially restrict a transportation
network company driver's access to the digital network, including
blocking access to the digital network, suspending a driver from the
digital network or changing a driver's status on the digital network from
eligible to provide prearranged rides to ineligible to provide
prearranged rides.
(b) (1) A transportation network company shall conduct, or have a
consumer reporting agency regulated under the federal Fair Credit
Reporting Act conduct, a local, state and national criminal history
records check, including a search of state and national sexual offender
registry databases, or arrange for the fingerprinting of the individual to
be submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national
criminal history records check and to the State Police Bureau of
Identification for a state criminal history records check conducted in
accordance with section 29-17a, at least once every [three years] year
after permitting an individual to act as a transportation network
company driver.
(2) A transportation network company shall provide, and require
each transportation network company driver to complete, an annual
training concerning sexual assault prevention and driver education.
Such training shall include information regarding the prevention,
identification and reporting of sexual assault and instruction regarding
Public Act No. 26-63 31 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
appropriate interactions with transportation network company riders.
(c) (1) No transportation network company shall permit an individual
to act as a transportation network company driver on its digital network
if such individual: (A) Has, during the three years prior to the date of
such individual's application to be a transportation network company
driver, (i) committed more than three moving violations, as defined in
section 14-111g, (ii) committed one serious traffic violation, as defined
in section 14-1, as amended by this act, or (iii) had his or her motor
vehicle operator's license suspended pursuant to section 14-227b; (B) has
been convicted, within seven years prior to the date of such individual's
application, of driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, fraud,
sexual offenses, use of a motor vehicle to commit a felony, acts of
violence or acts of terror; (C) is included in the state sexual offenders
registry or the United States Department of Justice National Sex
Offender Public Website; (D) does not possess a Connecticut motor
vehicle operator's license or a motor vehicle operator's license issued by
a reciprocal state; (E) does not possess proof of registration for each
motor vehicle such individual proposes to use as a transportation
network company vehicle; [or] (F) is not at least nineteen years of age;
or (G) fails to submit to a periodic identity verification when requested
by the transportation network company through its digital network
when such driver is connected to and active on the digital network. For
the purposes of this subsection, "reciprocal state" means a state that
permits transportation network company drivers who possess a
Connecticut motor vehicle operator's license to provide a prearranged
ride that originates in such state.
(2) An individual who is permitted to act as a transportation network
company driver shall report to the transportation network company not
later than twenty-four hours after the occurrence of any of the following:
(A) The commission of a fourth moving violation, as defined in section
14-111g, during the past three years; (B) the commission of one serious
Public Act No. 26-63 32 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
traffic violation, as defined in section 14-1, as amended by this act; (C)
the suspension of his or her motor vehicle operator's license pursuant to
section 14-227b; (D) the conviction of driving under the influence of
drugs or alcohol, fraud, sexual offenses, use of a motor vehicle to
commit a felony, acts of violence or acts of terror; (E) inclusion in the
state sexual offenders registry or the United States Department of Justice
National Sex Offender Public Website; (F) failure to possess an
operator's license; or (G) failure to possess proof of registration for a
transportation network company vehicle. Each transportation network
company that receives a report pursuant to this subdivision or becomes
aware of such occurrence shall prohibit the individual from acting as a
transportation network company driver on the company's digital
network until the individual meets the qualifications of this section to
be a transportation network company driver.
(3) Not later than five days after a transportation network company
permanently completes an investigation and, as a result of such
investigation, permanently bans a transportation network company
driver's access to the company's digital network due to a sexual assault
or assault resulting in another person's death that was connected to the
driver's use of such digital network, such transportation network
company shall notify, or cause to be notified, each registered
transportation network company in the state of such ban and the
driver's first and last name, date of birth and motor vehicle operator's
license number.
(d) (1) A transportation network company shall adopt a policy that a
transportation network company driver shall not use or be under the
influence of drugs or alcohol while the driver is connected to the
company's digital network or engaged in the provision of a prearranged
ride. The company shall provide notice of such policy on its Internet
web site, and include procedures for a transportation network company
rider to report a complaint about a driver whom the rider reasonably
Public Act No. 26-63 33 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
suspects was using or under the influence of drugs or alcohol while
engaged in the provision of a prearranged ride.
(2) Upon the company's receipt of a complaint by a rider alleging a
violation of such policy, the company shall suspend the driver's access
to the company's digital network as soon as possible and conduct an
investigation into the reported incident. The suspension shall last until
completion of the investigation. If the investigation confirms the driver
used or was under the influence of drugs or alcohol while engaged in
the provision of a prearranged ride or while connected to the company's
digital network, the company shall ban the driver's access to the digital
network on a permanent basis.
(3) The company shall maintain all records related to the enforcement
of such policy for a period of not less than three years from the date that
a complaint by a rider is received by the company.
(e) A transportation network company shall adopt a policy that
prohibits a transportation network company driver from providing a
prearranged ride when such driver's ability to operate a transportation
network company motor vehicle is impaired by illness, fatigue or any
other condition that would likely preclude safe operation of such
vehicle.
(f) A transportation network company driver shall: (1) Comply with
all applicable laws regarding nondiscrimination against transportation
network company riders or potential transportation network company
riders on the basis of age, color, creed, destination, intellectual or
physical disability, national origin, race, sex, sexual orientation or
gender identity; (2) comply with all applicable laws relating to the
accommodation of service animals and accommodate service animals
without imposing additional charges for such accommodation; (3)
comply with the policies adopted by the transportation network
company pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 13b-
Public Act No. 26-63 34 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
118, as amended by this act, and subsections (d) and (e) of this section;
(4) not impose additional charges for providing prearranged rides to
persons with physical disabilities because of such disabilities; and (5)
not solicit or accept a request for transportation unless the request is
accepted through the transportation network company's digital
network. [For the purposes of this subsection, "service animal" has the
same meaning as provided in section 22-345.]
(g) (1) Any person who holds himself or herself out to be a
transportation network company driver who is not permitted by a
transportation network company to use its digital network shall be
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(2) The state shall remit to a municipality fifty per cent of the fine
amount received for a violation of subdivision (1) of this subsection with
respect to each summons issued by such municipality. Each clerk of the
Superior Court or the Chief Court Administrator, or any other official of
the Superior Court designated by the Chief Court Administrator, shall,
on or before the thirtieth day of January, April, July and October in each
year, certify to the Comptroller the amount due for the previous quarter
under this subsection to each municipality served by the office of the
clerk or official.
(h) (1) A transportation network company vehicle shall (A) have four
doors; (B) not be older than twelve model years old; and (C) be designed
to transport no more than eight passengers, including the driver.
(2) Before any motor vehicle is used by a transportation network
company driver as a transportation network company vehicle, and
every two years thereafter, the driver shall certify to the transportation
network company that the following equipment is in good working
order: (A) Foot brakes; (B) emergency brakes; (C) steering mechanism;
(D) windshield; (E) rear window and other glass; (F) windshield wipers;
(G) headlights; (H) tail lights; (I) turn indicator lights; (J) brake lights;
Public Act No. 26-63 35 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(K) front seat adjustment mechanism; (L) doors; (M) horn; (N)
speedometer; (O) bumpers; (P) muffler and exhaust system; (Q)
condition of tires, including tread depth; (R) interior and exterior
rearview mirrors; and (S) seat safety belts and air bags for driver and
passengers. The transportation network company shall maintain such
certification for not less than three years.
Sec. 21. Subsection (e) of section 13b-117 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
(e) Not later than [January 1, 2026] February 1, 2027, and annually
thereafter, each transportation network company registered in the state
shall submit a report to the Commissioner of Transportation, in a form
and manner prescribed by the commissioner. Each such report shall use
aggregate data from the preceding year and include the following
information: (1) The average fare collected from transportation network
company riders, (2) the total time transportation network company
drivers spent providing prearranged rides, and (3) the total
compensation paid to transportation network company drivers for the
provision of prearranged rides.
Sec. 22. Section 13b-23c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Transportation shall establish a matching grant
program for the purpose of assisting municipalities to modernize
existing traffic signal equipment and operations to (1) make such
equipment and operations capable of utilizing transit signal priority and
responsive to congestion, and [to] (2) reduce idling. Applications shall
be submitted annually to the commissioner at such times and in such
manner as the commissioner prescribes. The commissioner shall
develop the eligibility criteria for participation in the program and
determine the amount a municipality shall be required to provide to
Public Act No. 26-63 36 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
match any such grant. The commissioner shall give preference to
applications [submitted by two or more municipalities and establish
incentives for projects undertaken by two or more municipalities]
involving projects located in heavily congested areas.
Sec. 23. Subsection (g) of section 21 of public act 20-1, as amended by
section 344 of public act 22-118 and section 74 of public act 23-205, is
amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(g) For the Department of Transportation: For construction, repair or
maintenance of highways, roads, bridges, noise barriers or bus and rail
facilities and equipment, not exceeding $130,000,000, provided not more
than $75,000,000 shall be used for a matching grant program established
pursuant to section 13b-23c of the general statutes, as amended by this
act, to assist municipalities to modernize existing traffic signal
equipment and operations.
Sec. 24. Section 22a-201d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, (1) "zero-emission school bus" has the same
meaning as provided in 42 USC 16091(a)(8), as amended from time to
time, (2) "alternative fuel school bus" means a school bus that reduces
emissions and is operated entirely or in part using liquefied natural gas,
compressed natural gas, hydrogen, propane or biofuels, [and (3)
"environmental justice community" has the same meaning as provided
in subsection (a) of section 22a-20a] (3) "distressed municipality" means
a municipality that is a distressed municipality under the provisions of
subsection (b) of section 32-9p on July 1, 2026, (4) "carrier" has the same
meaning as provided in section 14-212, and (5) "biodiesel" has the same
meaning as provided in section 32-324.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, [(1) on and
after January 1, 2035, one hundred per cent of the school buses that
Public Act No. 26-63 37 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
provide transportation for all school districts in the state shall be zero-
emission school buses or alternative fuel school buses, and (2)] on and
after January 1, 2040, [one hundred] ninety per cent of the school buses
that provide transportation for [all school districts] each school district
in the state shall be zero-emission school buses.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2035, each municipality that is not a
distressed municipality shall submit a plan and schedule to the
commissioner that outlines how such municipality will achieve
compliance with the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(c) (1) On and after [January 1, 2030, one hundred] July 1, 2035, fifty
per cent of the school buses that provide transportation for [school
districts entirely within an environmental justice community as of July
1, 2022, or in an area that encompasses at least one environmental justice
community as of July 1, 2022,] each school district in a distressed
municipality shall be zero-emission school buses.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2029, each distressed municipality shall
submit a plan and schedule to the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection that outlines how such distressed
municipality will achieve compliance with the provisions of subdivision
(1) of this subsection.
(d) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, in
consultation with the Connecticut Green Bank, shall establish and
administer a grant program for the purpose of providing [matching] a
portion of the funds necessary for municipalities, school districts and
school bus operators [to submit federal grant applications in order] to
maximize federal, state or other sources of funding or financing for the
purchase or lease of zero-emission school buses and electric vehicle
charging or fueling infrastructure. Applications for such grants shall be
filed with the commissioner at such time and in such manner as the
commissioner prescribes. The commissioner shall give preference to
Public Act No. 26-63 38 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
applications concerning the purchase or lease of a zero-emission school
bus that will be operated [primarily in an environmental justice
community. The commissioner shall determine the amount a
municipality, school district or school bus operator shall be required to
provide to match such grant] in a distressed municipality.
(e) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection shall,
within available funds and appropriations, provide administrative and
technical assistance to municipalities, school districts and school bus
operators that are transitioning to the use of zero-emission school buses,
applying for federal grants for such buses and installing electric vehicle
charging and fueling infrastructure.
Sec. 25. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The executive director of the
Connecticut Port Authority, or the executive director's designee, shall
convene a working group to study and make recommendations
regarding (1) potential state policies and incentives to encourage the
utilization of freight rail and sea lanes and ports for the transportation
of goods within the state, including, but not limited to, construction
materials, metals and industrial materials, agricultural and food
products and municipal solid waste, as defined in section 22a-207 of the
general statutes, (2) opportunities to expand freight rail and port
infrastructure within the state, and (3) the environmental, economic and
transportation impacts of increasing the utilization of freight rail and sea
lanes and ports.
(b) The working group shall consist of the Commissioners of
Transportation, Energy and Environmental Protection and Economic
and Community Development, or the commissioners' respective
designees, and any other member invited to participate by the executive
director of the Connecticut Port Authority, including, but not limited to,
representatives of organizations representing the interests of
manufacturers in the state, representatives of freight rail carriers,
collectors of solid waste and recyclable items and any other member as
Public Act No. 26-63 39 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
deemed necessary by the executive director of the Connecticut Port
Authority. The executive director shall serve as chairperson of the
working group and shall schedule the first meeting of the working
group not later than September 1, 2026.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the executive director of the
Connecticut Port Authority shall submit, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, the results of such
study and any recommendations to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
transportation. The working group shall terminate on the date that the
executive director submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is
later.
Sec. 26. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Removal" means the clearing of an encampment, or a portion
thereof, by the Department of Transportation or an agent or contractor
of the department and includes, but is not limited to, requiring persons
to vacate the property and collecting, relocating, discarding or disposing
of any structures or materials used for habitation and personal property;
(2) "Encampment" means any outdoor location where one or more
persons sleep or reside using tents, tarps, bedding or other temporary
shelter or structures for the purposes of habitation. "Encampment" does
not include a campground or other location that is designated or
authorized for recreational camping by a federal, state or municipal
agency or by a private property owner and where camping occurs;
(3) "State highway right-of-way" means land owned or controlled by
the Department of Transportation for highway purposes, including the
traveled way, shoulders, medians, slopes, drainage areas and areas
beneath or adjacent to bridges and overpasses. "State highway right-of-
way" does not include any land owned or controlled by the department
Public Act No. 26-63 40 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
improved with a safety rest area, service plaza, bus shelter or commuter
parking facility pursuant to section 13b-29 of the general statutes; and
(4) "Personal property" means an item that can reasonably be
identified as belonging to a person, has apparent value or utility and is
not hazardous.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, prior to the
removal of an encampment located upon any state highway right-of-
way, the Department of Transportation shall provide at least fourteen
days' written notice that specifies the date and time such removal will
take place and that no person or personal property is permitted to
remain on the state highway right-of-way after such date. The
department shall, at a minimum, post any such notice at the apparent
place of ingress and egress to the encampment and at any apparent
common area of the encampment. Such notice shall be printed in
English and Spanish. When posting such notice, the department may
provide oral or written notice to any person present at the encampment.
(c) The notice required by subsection (b) of this section shall not be
required if the Commissioner of Transportation determines the removal
of an encampment is necessary to respond to any transportation
operations or infrastructure emergency or a public safety emergency.
The commissioner shall document, in writing, the reasons for such
determination.
Sec. 27. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, "removal",
"encampment" and "personal property" have the same meanings as
provided in section 26 of this act.
(b) The Commissioners of Transportation and Mental Health and
Addiction Services shall jointly study and make recommendations
regarding best practices and standards to adhere to when responding
to, managing or removing an encampment upon any state highway
Public Act No. 26-63 41 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
right-of-way.
(c) Such study shall, at a minimum, identify: (1) Best practices from
other states or municipalities regarding (A) the provision of advance
notices concerning the removal of an encampment to a person residing
at such encampment, including methods and reasonable timeframes for
providing such notices and the frequency of such notices, and (B) the
treatment of personal property during a removal of an encampment, (2)
procedures for outreach and engagement by trained personnel that
ensure respect for the personal dignity and property of persons at such
encampments, (3) appropriate state and local agencies to offer
immediate assistance and support to such persons for emergency
shelters, transitional housing or permanent housing, social services or
other interventions prior to and during the removal of an encampment,
(4) guidance, training or technical assistance that could be provided to
state and local agencies and municipalities regarding humane and
effective practices for responding to, managing and removing such
encampments, and (5) ways to ensure coordination with the
municipality where the encampment is located, community-based
organizations serving persons experiencing homelessness, local
housing authorities, other local service providers and the local law
enforcement agency, as appropriate, prior to the removal of an
encampment.
(d) Not later than January 15, 2027, the Commissioners of
Transportation and Mental Health and Addiction Services shall jointly
submit, in accordance with provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, the results of such study and any recommendations to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to transportation.
Sec. 28. Subsections (c) and (d) of section 15-13 of the general statutes
are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-63 42 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(c) Each pilot shall, upon the granting of a license, [pay a fee of thirty
dollars to said authority and shall] give a bond of one thousand dollars
to the Treasurer and the Treasurer's successors in office, with surety, to
the acceptance of the authority, conditioned for the faithful performance
of [his or her] such pilot's duties as a pilot, upon which bond suit may
be brought in the name of said Treasurer for the benefit of any person
who may suffer loss or damage, by reason of the ignorance, neglect or
misconduct of such pilot in the discharge of such pilot's duties. [The
authority shall increase such fee by fifty per cent July 1, 1985, by an
additional fifty per cent effective July 1, 1989, by an additional twenty-
five per cent effective July 1, 1991, and by an additional twenty-five per
cent effective July 1, 1993.]
(d) Each license shall expire on the last day of December following its
issuance and may be renewed upon application, [and payment of the
fee required by subsection (c) of this section,] renewal of the bond
required under subsection (c) of this section and proof of current federal
licensure as required in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 29. Subsection (d) of section 13b-59 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(d) "License, permit and fee revenues" means (1) all fees and other
charges required by, or levied pursuant to sections 12-487, 13b-80 and
13b-97, subsection (b) of section 14-12, sections 14-16a, 14-21c, 14-44h
and 14-44i, subsection (v) of section 14-49, subsections (b) and (f) of
section 14-50, subdivisions (7) to (9), inclusive, of subsection (a) of
section 14-50a, sections 14-52, 14-58, 14-67l and 14-69, subsection (e) of
section 14-73, sections 14-96q and 14-103a, subsection (a) of section 14-
164a, subsection (a) of section 14-192, subsection (d) of section 14-270,
sections 14-319 and 14-320 and sections 13b-410a to 13b-410c, inclusive;
(2) all aeronautics, waterways, and other fees and charges required by,
or levied pursuant to sections 13a-80 and 13a-80a [,] and subsection (b)
Public Act No. 26-63 43 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
of section 13b-42; [and subsections (c) and (d) of section 15-13;] and (3)
all motor vehicle related fines, penalties or other charges, as defined in
subsection (g) of this section;
Sec. 30. Section 14-80 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Each motor vehicle and the devices on such vehicle shall be
operated, equipped, constructed and adjusted to prevent unnecessary
or unusual noise.
(b) (1) Each motor vehicle operated by an internal combustion engine
shall be equipped, except as hereinafter provided, with a muffler or
mufflers designed to prevent excessive, unusual or unnecessary exhaust
noise. The muffler or mufflers shall be maintained by the owner in good
working order and shall be in use whenever the motor vehicle is
operated.
(2) No person, including a motor vehicle dealer or repairer or a
motorcycle dealer, shall install, and no person shall use, on a motor
vehicle, a muffler or mufflers lacking interior baffle plates or other
effective muffling devices, a gutted muffler, a muffler cutout or a
straight exhaust except when the motor vehicle is operated in a race,
contest or demonstration of speed or skill as a public exhibition
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 14-164a, or any mechanical device
which will amplify the noise emitted by the vehicle.
(3) No person, including a motor vehicle dealer or repairer or a
motorcycle dealer, shall remove all or part of any muffler on a motor
vehicle except to repair or replace the muffler or part for the more
effective prevention of noise.
(4) No person shall use on the exhaust system or tail pipe of a motor
vehicle any extension or device which will cause excessive or unusual
noise.
Public Act No. 26-63 44 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(c) The engine of every motor vehicle shall be equipped and adjusted
to prevent excessive fumes or exhaust smoke.
(d) All pipes carrying exhaust gases from the motor shall be
constructed of, and maintained with, leak-proof metal. Exhaust pipes
shall be directed from the muffler or mufflers toward the rear of the
vehicle and shall be approximately parallel with the longitudinal axis of
the vehicle and approximately parallel to the surface of the roadway, or
shall be directed from the muffler upward to a location above the cab or
body of the vehicle so that fumes, gases and smoke are directed away
from the occupants of the vehicle. Exhaust pipes on a passenger vehicle
shall extend to the extreme rear end of the vehicle's body, not including
the bumper and its attachments to the body, or shall be attached to the
vehicle in such a way that the exhaust pipes direct the exhaust gases to
either side of the vehicle ensuring that fresh ambient air is located under
the vehicle at all times. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to establish
safety standards for passenger vehicles equipped with exhaust pipes
located in front of the rear axle.
(e) Every motor vehicle shall, when operated on a highway, be
equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting
sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than
two hundred feet, but no horn or other warning device shall emit an
unreasonably loud or harsh sound or a whistle.
(f) (1) No vehicle shall be equipped with, nor shall any person use on
a vehicle, any siren, whistle or bell as a warning signal device, except as
otherwise permitted by this section.
(2) Any motor vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal
device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an
ordinary warning signal.
Public Act No. 26-63 45 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(3) Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with a siren,
whistle or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under normal
conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred feet and of a
type approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles. Such signal shall
not be used unless the vehicle is operated in response to an emergency
call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the
law, in which event the driver of the vehicle shall sound the signal when
reasonably necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of the
approach of the vehicle.
(g) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be
fined [one hundred fifty] three hundred dollars for each offense.
Sec. 31. Section 14-296aa of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section: [, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(1) "Mobile telephone" means a cellular, analog, wireless or digital
telephone capable of sending or receiving telephone communications
without an access line for service.
(2) "Using" or "use" means holding a hand-held mobile telephone to,
or in the immediate proximity of, the user's ear.
(3) "Hand-held mobile telephone" means a mobile telephone with
which a user engages in a call using at least one hand.
(4) "Hands-free accessory" means an attachment, add-on, built-in
feature, or addition to a mobile telephone, whether or not permanently
installed in a motor vehicle, that, when used, allows the vehicle operator
to maintain both hands on the steering wheel.
(5) "Hands-free mobile telephone" means a hand-held mobile
Public Act No. 26-63 46 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
telephone that has an internal feature or function, or that is equipped
with an attachment or addition, whether or not permanently part of
such hand-held mobile telephone, by which a user engages in a call
without the use of either hand, whether or not the use of either hand is
necessary to activate, deactivate or initiate a function of such telephone.
(6) "Engage in a call" means talking into or listening on a hand-held
mobile telephone, but does not include holding a hand-held mobile
telephone to activate, deactivate or initiate a function of such telephone.
(7) "Immediate proximity" means the distance that permits the
operator of a hand-held mobile telephone to hear telecommunications
transmitted over such hand-held mobile telephone, but does not require
physical contact with such operator's ear.]
(1) "Hands-free mode" means the operation of a mobile electronic
device by which a user engages in a voice communication or receives
audio without touching or holding such device, except to activate,
deactivate or initiate with a single touch or swipe of the user's hand.
[(8)] (2) "Mobile electronic device" means any hand-held or other
portable electronic equipment capable of providing data
communication between two or more persons, including, but not
limited to, a mobile telephone, a text messaging device, a paging device,
a personal digital assistant, a laptop computer, equipment that is
capable of playing a video game or a digital video disk, [or] equipment
on which digital photographs are taken or transmitted, equipment to
display a video or moving image or any combination thereof. [, but]
"Mobile electronic device" does not include any audio equipment or any
equipment installed in a motor vehicle for the purpose of providing
navigation, emergency assistance to the operator of such motor vehicle
or video entertainment to the passengers in the rear seats of such motor
vehicle.
Public Act No. 26-63 47 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
[(9)] (3) "Operating a motor vehicle" means operating a motor vehicle
on any highway, [as defined in section 14-1,] including being
temporarily stationary due to traffic, road conditions or a traffic control
sign or signal, but not including being parked on the side or shoulder of
any highway where such vehicle is safely able to remain stationary.
(4) "Highway", "commercial motor vehicle" and "authorized
emergency vehicle" have the same meanings as provided in section 14-
1, as amended by this act.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections (c) and (d) of this section, no person shall operate a motor
vehicle upon a highway [, as defined in section 14-1, while using a hand-
held mobile telephone to engage in a call or while using] while (A)
holding or supporting a mobile electronic device [. An operator of a
motor vehicle who types, sends or reads a text message with a hand-
held mobile telephone or mobile electronic device while operating a
motor vehicle shall be in violation of this section, except that if] with any
part of such person's body; (B) using a mobile electronic device, unless
such device is being used in a hands-free mode; (C) reading, viewing or
typing a text message or other nonvoice message or communication on
a mobile electronic device; or (D) a video or moving image on a mobile
electronic device or an installed screen or other device of a similar nature
is visible to such person while seated in the normal operating position,
unless such video or moving image is (i) a map generated by a
navigation system or application on such device or screen and such
device or screen is mounted on or affixed to the motor vehicle's
windshield, dashboard or center console in a manner that does not
impede the operation of the motor vehicle, or (ii) used to assist such
person while backing or parking, to enhance or supplement such
person's view of the roadway or to assist such person in object detection.
If such operator is driving a commercial motor vehicle, [as defined in
section 14-1,] such operator shall be charged with a violation of
Public Act No. 26-63 48 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
subsection (e) of this section.
[(2) An operator of a motor vehicle who holds a hand-held mobile
telephone to, or in the immediate proximity of, his or her ear while
operating a motor vehicle is presumed to be engaging in a call within
the meaning of this section. The presumption established by this
subdivision is rebuttable by evidence tending to show that the operator
was not engaged in a call.]
[(3)] (2) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as
authorizing the seizure or forfeiture of [a hand-held mobile telephone
or] a mobile electronic device, unless otherwise provided by law.
[(4) Subdivision] (3) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall not apply to: (A) [The use of a hand-held mobile
telephone] Holding or using a mobile electronic device for the sole
purpose of communicating with any of the following regarding an
emergency situation: An emergency response operator; a hospital,
physician's office or health clinic; an ambulance company; a fire
department; or a police department, [or] (B) any of the following
persons while in the performance of their official duties and within the
scope of their employment: A peace officer, as defined in subdivision (9)
of section 53a-3, a firefighter or an operator of an ambulance or
authorized emergency vehicle [, as defined in section 14-1,] or a member
of the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 27-103,
while operating a military vehicle, or (C) [the use of] using a hand-held
radio by a person with an amateur radio station license issued by the
Federal Communications Commission in emergency situations for
emergency purposes only. [, or (D) the use of a hands-free mobile
telephone.]
(c) No [person shall use a hand-held mobile telephone or other
electronic device, including those with hands-free accessories, or a
mobile electronic device, while operating] school bus operator shall
Public Act No. 26-63 49 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
operate a school bus that is carrying passengers [, except that this
subsection shall not apply when such person: (1) Places an emergency
call to school officials; (2)] while using a mobile electronic device,
including when such device is in hands-free mode, unless such school
bus operator: (1) Holds or uses a hand-held mobile telephone as
[provided in] permitted under subparagraph (A) of subdivision [(4)] (3)
of subsection (b) of this section; [(3)] (2) uses a [hand-held mobile
telephone or] mobile electronic device in a manner similar to a two-way
radio to allow real-time communication with a school official, an
emergency response operator, a hospital, physician's office or health
clinic, an ambulance company, a fire department or a police department;
or [(4)] (3) uses a mobile electronic device with a video display, provided
such device (A) is used as a global positioning system or to provide
navigation, (B) is securely attached inside the school bus near such
[person] operator, and (C) has been approved for such use by the
Department of Motor Vehicles.
(d) No person under eighteen years of age shall [use any hand-held
mobile telephone, including one with a hands-free accessory, or]
operate a motor vehicle upon a highway while using a mobile electronic
device, [while operating a motor vehicle on a public highway] including
when such device is in hands-free mode, except as [provided in]
permitted under subparagraph (A) of subdivision [(4)] (3) of subsection
(b) of this section.
(e) No person shall [use a hand-held mobile telephone or other
electronic device or type, read or send text or a text message with or
from a mobile telephone or mobile electronic device while operating a
commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section 14-1, except for the
purpose of communicating with any of the following regarding an
emergency situation: An emergency response operator; a hospital;
physician's office or health clinic; an ambulance company; a fire
department or a police department] operate a commercial motor vehicle
Public Act No. 26-63 50 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
in violation of the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this
section, except as permitted under subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3)
of subsection (b) of this section.
(f) Except as provided in subsections (b) to (e), inclusive, of this
section, no person shall (1) engage in any activity not related to the
actual operation of a motor vehicle in a manner that interferes with the
safe operation of such vehicle on any highway, [as defined in section 14-
1] or (2) fail to maintain a proper lookout while operating a motor
vehicle.
(g) Any law enforcement officer who issues a summons for a
violation of this section shall record on such summons the specific
nature of any distracted driving behavior observed by such officer.
(h) Any person who violates this section shall be fined two hundred
dollars for a first violation, three hundred seventy-five dollars for a
second violation and six hundred twenty-five dollars for a third or
subsequent violation.
(i) An operator of a motor vehicle who commits a moving violation,
as defined in subsection (a) of section 14-111g, while engaged in any
activity prohibited by this section shall be fined in accordance with
subsection (h) of this section, in addition to any penalty or fine imposed
for the moving violation.
(j) The state shall remit to a municipality twenty-five per cent of the
fine amount received for a violation of this section with respect to each
summons issued by such municipality. Each clerk of the Superior Court
or the Chief Court Administrator, or any other official of the Superior
Court designated by the Chief Court Administrator, shall, on or before
the thirtieth day of January, April, July and October in each year, certify
to the Comptroller the amount due for the previous quarter under this
subsection to each municipality served by the office of the clerk or
Public Act No. 26-63 51 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
official.
(k) A record of any violation of this section shall appear on the
driving history record or motor vehicle record, as defined in section 14-
10, of any person who commits such violation, and the record of such
violation shall be available to any motor vehicle insurer in accordance
with the provisions of section 14-10.
Sec. 32. Subdivision (3) of subsection (e) of section 14-36 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(3) Before granting a license to any applicant who has not previously
held a Connecticut motor vehicle operator's license, or whose
Connecticut motor vehicle operator's license expired more than two
years prior to the application date, the commissioner shall require the
applicant to demonstrate personally to the commissioner, a deputy, a
motor vehicle inspector or an agent of the commissioner, in such manner
as the commissioner directs, that the applicant is a proper person to
operate motor vehicles of the class for which such applicant has applied,
has sufficient knowledge of the mechanism of the motor vehicles to
ensure their safe operation by him or her and has satisfactory
knowledge of the laws concerning motor vehicles and the rules of the
road. The knowledge test of an applicant for a class D motor vehicle
operator's license shall include a question concerning highway work
zone safety and the responsibilities of an operator of a motor vehicle
under section 14-212d. Each such knowledge test shall include not less
than one question concerning distracted driving, the use of mobile
[telephones and] electronic devices by motor vehicle operators or the
responsibilities of motor vehicle operators under section 14-296aa, as
amended by this act. If any such applicant has held a license from a state,
territory or possession of the United States where a similar examination
is required, the commissioner may waive part or all of the examination.
If any such applicant is (A) a veteran who applies not later than two
Public Act No. 26-63 52 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
years after the date of discharge from the military and who, prior to such
discharge, held a military operator's license for motor vehicles of the
same class as that for which such applicant has applied, or (B) a member
of the armed forces or the National Guard who currently holds a
military operator's license for motor vehicles of the same class as that for
which such applicant has applied, the commissioner shall waive all of
the examination, except in the case of a commercial motor vehicle
license, the commissioner shall waive the driving skills test for such
applicant and may, in such commissioner's discretion, waive the
knowledge test for such application, provided such applicant meets the
conditions set forth in 49 CFR 383.77, as amended from time to time. For
the purposes of this subsection, "veteran" and "armed forces" have the
same meanings as provided in section 27-103. When the commissioner
is satisfied as to the ability and competency of any applicant, the
commissioner may issue to such applicant a license, either unlimited or
containing such limitations as the commissioner deems advisable, and
specifying the class of motor vehicles which the licensee is eligible to
operate.
Sec. 33. Subdivision (88) of section 14-1 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(88) "Serious traffic violation" means a conviction of any of the
following offenses: (A) Excessive speeding, involving a single offense in
which the speed is fifteen miles per hour or more above the posted
speed limit, in violation of section 14-218a or 14-219; (B) reckless driving
in violation of section 14-222; (C) following too closely in violation of
section 14-240 or 14-240a; (D) improper or erratic lane changes, in
violation of section 14-236; (E) using a [hand-held mobile telephone or
other electronic device or typing, reading or sending text or a text
message with or from a mobile telephone or] mobile electronic device in
violation of subsection (e) of section 14-296aa, as amended by this act,
Public Act No. 26-63 53 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
while operating a commercial motor vehicle; (F) driving a commercial
motor vehicle without a valid commercial driver's license in violation of
section 14-36a or 14-44a; (G) failure to carry a commercial driver's
license in violation of section 14-44a; (H) failure to have the proper class
of license or endorsement, or violation of a license restriction in violation
of section 14-44a; or (I) a violation of any provision of chapter 248, by an
operator who holds a commercial driver's license or learner's permit that
results in the death of another person;
Sec. 34. Subdivision (15) of subsection (a) of section 42-110x of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(15) "Video game console" (A) means any computing device,
including, but not limited to, any console machine, handheld console
device or similar device or system, that is primarily used by consumers
to play video games, (B) includes, but is not limited to, the components
and peripherals of any computing device described in subparagraph (A)
of this subdivision, and (C) does not include any (i) general or all-
purpose computing device, (ii) desktop, laptop or tablet computer, or
(iii) [hand-held] mobile telephone. [, as defined in section 14-296aa.]
Sec. 35. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force to
study and make recommendations regarding parking access challenges
faced by home health agencies, as defined in section 19a-490 of the
general statutes, while delivering services in residential settings. Such
study shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) an assessment of
parking restrictions, time limits, permit requirements and enforcement
practices affecting home health agencies, (2) an analysis of geographic
areas in the state where parking limitations most significantly impact
the delivery of home health care services, and (3) a review of parking
accommodation programs in other jurisdictions, including temporary
permits and designated home health agency parking and enforcement
exemptions.
Public Act No. 26-63 54 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom is an employee of a home health agency and one of whom
has expertise in municipal parking policy or enforcement;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom is a member of a local traffic authority of a municipality with a
population of one hundred thousand or more, as determined by the
most recent decennial census, and one of whom has expertise in
municipal planning, transportation or urban policy;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who is a representative of a home health care agency,
as defined in section 19a-490 of the general statutes;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who is a
member of a municipal parking authority;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who is a representative of an association representing
the interests of home health agencies;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who is a
representative of a state-wide organization representing the interests of
municipalities; and
(7) Two persons appointed by the Governor, one of whom is a
representative of an organization that advocates on behalf of patients
receiving home health care services and one of whom is a representative
of a labor organization representing home health agency workers.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
Public Act No. 26-63 55 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
transportation shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
transportation, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that it
submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
Sec. 36. (Effective from passage) (a) For the purposes of supporting the
administration of section 22a-201d of the general statutes, as amended
by this act, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
shall establish a working group to evaluate and make recommendations
regarding the increased use of alternative fuels and technologies,
including, but not limited to, biodiesel, propane and electric school
buses, for use in school bus fleets in the state.
(b) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, or
the commissioner's designee, shall convene and serve as chairperson of
the working group. The working group shall include the following
members: (1) The Commissioners of Public Health, Education and
Transportation, or the commissioners' respective designees; (2) the chief
Public Act No. 26-63 56 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
executive officer of the Connecticut Green Bank, or the chief executive
officer's designee, (3) one representative of a school transportation
provider operating in the state; (4) one representative of a municipality
or local or regional board of education; (5) one representative of the
alternative fuels industry; (6) one representative of an environmental
organization with expertise in air quality; (7) one representative of a
state-wide or regional coalition with expertise in clean transportation
and alternative fuel deployment; and (8) such other individuals as the
commissioner deems necessary to carry out the purposes of the working
group.
(c) The working group shall:
(1) Review the use of alternative fuels and technologies, including,
but not limited to, biodiesel, propane and electric school buses, in school
bus fleets in the state and other jurisdictions. Such review shall include
identifying relevant case studies and best practices;
(2) Evaluate the technical, operational, environmental and economic
considerations associated with the expanded use of alternative fuels and
technologies in school bus fleets, including, but not limited to: (A)
Emissions performance, including impacts on criteria air pollutants and
greenhouse gas emissions; (B) fuel availability and supply constraints;
(C) costs and potential cost savings, including lifecycle costs; (D)
operational performance, including performance in cold weather
conditions; (E) impacts on engine durability and maintenance; (F)
manufacturer warranty considerations; (G) fuel procurement and
contracting practices for school districts and school transportation
providers; and (H) a comparative assessment of such alternative fuels
and technologies, including, but not limited to, renewable diesel and
zero-emission school buses, as defined in subsection (a) of section 22a-
201d of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(3) Identify pathways and barriers to the adoption of alternative fuels
Public Act No. 26-63 57 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
and technologies in school bus fleets, including infrastructure,
contractual, regulatory and economic considerations;
(4) Develop recommendations to support the increased use of
biodiesel where appropriate, including potential incentive structures,
funding mechanisms and procurement strategies; and
(5) Evaluate the role of alternative fuels as a transitional strategy
toward the deployment of zero-emission school buses, including
impacts on the state's greenhouse reduction goals established in section
22a-200a of the general statutes.
(d) Not later than February 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report, in accordance with section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to the environment, energy and technology and
transportation. Such report shall include the findings and
recommendations of the working group, including any
recommendations for regulatory or legislative action.
(e) The Department of Energy and Environmental Protection shall
provide administrative staff support to the working group.
(f) The working group shall terminate on the date that it submits the
report required under subsection (d) of this section, or February 1, 2027,
whichever is later.
Sec. 37. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Prior to the purchase and use
of a zero-emission school bus, as defined in 42 USC 16091(a)(8), as
amended from time to time, each local or regional board of education
shall develop and implement safety plans that (1) consider the ages and
development needs of the students transported on such buses, and (2)
include procedures for the evacuation of such buses in the event of a
fire.
Public Act No. 26-63 58 of 59

Substitute House Bill No. 5464
Sec. 38. Section 38 of public act 25-65 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Governor's Action:
Approved May 27, 2026
Public Act No. 26-63 59 of 59